Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. Unlawful Acts.

Sec. 08.36.310.
Grounds for revocation of license. [Repealed, § 32 ch 49 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 08.36.315.
Grounds for discipline, suspension, or revocation of license.

The board may revoke or suspend the license of a dentist, or may reprimand, censure, or discipline a dentist, or both, if the board finds, after a hearing, that the dentist

used or knowingly cooperated in deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation to obtain a license;

engaged in deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation in the course of providing or billing for professional dental services or engaging in professional activities;

advertised professional dental services in a false or misleading manner;

received compensation for referring a person to another dentist or dental practice;

has been convicted of a felony or other crime that affects the dentist’s ability to continue to practice dentistry competently and safely;

engaged in the performance of patient care, or permitted the performance of patient care by persons under the dentist’s supervision, regardless of whether actual injury to the patient occurred,

that did not conform to minimum professional standards of dentistry; or

when the dentist, or a person under the supervision of the dentist, did not have the permit, registration, or certificate required under AS 08.32 or this chapter;

failed to comply with this chapter, with a regulation adopted under this chapter, or with an order of the board;

continued to practice after becoming unfit due to

professional incompetence;

addiction or dependence on alcohol or other drugs that impair the dentist’s ability to practice safely;

physical or mental disability;

engaged in lewd or immoral conduct in connection with the delivery of professional service to patients;

permitted a dental hygienist or dental assistant who is employed by the dentist or working under the dentist’s supervision to perform a dental procedure in violation of AS

08.32.110

or AS

08.36.346

;

failed to report to the board a death that occurred on the premises used for the practice of dentistry within 48 hours;

falsified or destroyed patient or facility records or failed to maintain a patient or facility record for at least seven years after the date the record was created;

prescribed or dispensed an opioid in excess of the maximum dosage authorized under AS

08.36.355

; or

procured, sold, prescribed, or dispensed drugs in violation of a law, regardless of whether there has been a criminal action or harm to the patient.

History.

(§ 28 ch 49 SLA 1980; am § 33 ch 100 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1995; am § 34 ch 53 SLA 2012; am § 4 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1998, a former reference in paragraph (10) to AS 08.36.070(a)(11) was changed to AS

08.36.070(a)(10)

to reflect the 1998 renumbering of that paragraph.

Cross references. —

For other disciplinary powers of board, see AS

08.01.075

.

Administrative Code. —

For administering of anesthetic agent, see 12 AAC 28, art. 1.

For continuing professional competence requirements, see 12 AAC 28, art. 4.

For parenteral sedation, see 12 AAC 28, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 26, 2017, added (13) and (14) and made a related change.

Collateral references. —

61 Am. Jur. 2d, Physicians, Surgeons and Other Healers, §§ 65-88.

70 C.J.S., Physicians and Surgeons, §§ 52-59.

Cancellation or suspension irrespective of licensee’s personal fault, validity of statute or rule making specified conduct or condition the ground for, 3 ALR2d 107.

Plea of nolo contendere or non vult contendere,
89 A.L.R.2d 540.

Alcoholism, narcotics addiction, or misconduct with respect to alcoholic beverages or narcotics, as ground for revocation or suspension of license to practice medicine or dentistry,
93 ALR2d 1398.

Revocation or suspension of dentist’s license for false claims, reports or bills for services in personal injury litigation, 95 ALR2d 873.

Practicing medicine, surgery, dentistry, optometry, podiatry, or other healing arts without license as a separate or continuing offense, 99 ALR2d 654.

Professional incompetency as ground for disciplinary measure against physician or dentist, 28 ALR3d 487.

Improper or immoral sexually related conduct toward patient as ground for disciplinary action against physician, dentist, or other licensed healer, 59 ALR4th 1104.

Necessity of expert evidence in proceeding for revocation or suspension of license of physician, surgeon, or dentist, 74 ALR4th 969.

Wrongful or excessive prescription of drugs as ground for revocation or suspension of license, 19 ALR6th 577.

Sec. 08.36.317.
Civil fine authority.

Notwithstanding AS

08.01.075(a)

, in a disciplinary action, the board may impose a civil fine not to exceed $25,000 for each violation of this chapter or of a regulation adopted under this chapter.

History.

(§ 8 ch 24 SLA 2001)

Sec. 08.36.320.
Summary license suspension.

[Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987.]

[Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987.]

The board may summarily suspend the license of a licensee who refuses to submit to a physical or mental examination under AS

08.36.070(b)(1)

. A person whose license is suspended under this section is entitled to a hearing conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) within seven days after the effective date of the order. If, after a hearing, the board upholds the suspension, the licensee may appeal the suspension to a court of competent jurisdiction.

[Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987.]

[Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987.]

History.

(§ 5 art IV ch 186 SLA 1955; am § 29 ch 49 SLA 1980; am §§ 34, 35 ch 100 SLA 1984; am §§ 21, 49 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 11 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For other disciplinary sanctions, see AS

08.01.075

.

Administrative Code. —

For administering of anesthetic agent, see 12 AAC 28, art. 1.

Collateral references. —

Bias of members of license revocation board. 97 ALR2d 1210.

Secs. 08.36.325 — 08.36.330.
Discipline, suspension or revocation of license of dentists. [Repealed, § 32 ch 49 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 08.36.340.
Penalties.

A person who violates any provision of this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter for which no specific penalty is provided is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 8 art IV ch 186 SLA 1955; am § 30 ch 49 SLA 1980; am § 36 ch 100 SLA 1984)

Cross references. —

For sentences for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.